Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2858.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 160.93, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Deposit of revenues; appropriation. (a) Except as provided in subdivision 2a, money collected from fees authorized under deleted text begin subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin subdivisionsnew text end 1 new text begin and 6 new text end must be deposited in a high-occupancy vehicle lane user fee account in the special revenue fund. A separate account must be established for each trunk highway corridor. Money in the account is appropriated to the commissioner. (b) From this appropriation the commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end first repay the trunk highway fund and any other fund source for money spent to install, equip, or modify the corridor for the purposes of subdivision 1, and then deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end pay all the costs of implementing and administering the fee collection system for that corridornew text begin , including the public notification and information requirements under subdivision 6, paragraph (e)new text end . (c) The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end spend remaining money in the account as follows: (1) one-half must be spent for transportation capital improvements within the corridor; and (2) one-half must be transferred to the Metropolitan Council for expansion and improvement of bus transit services within the corridor beyond the level of service provided on the date of implementation of subdivision 1. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 160.93, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin All-electric vehicles. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, "all-electric vehicle" has the meaning given in section 169.011, subdivision 1a. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding subdivision 1, 4, or 5, the driver of a single-occupant all-electric vehicle that displays the decal described in paragraph (c) may use a dynamic shoulder lane or designated high-occupancy vehicle lane without a fee or charge. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must create a decal for all-electric vehicles that may be affixed to the vehicle and is easily visible to law enforcement officials. The commissioner may regulate the number of decals required to be displayed on a vehicle and the location where the decals must be displayed. new text end new text begin (d) The owner of an all-electric vehicle must submit an application for the decals to the commissioner along with a fee of $24. If the commissioner is satisfied that the vehicle is an eligible all-electric vehicle, the commissioner must issue the decals to the owner of the eligible vehicle. Decals expire four years from the month of issuance. Decals issued to an eligible vehicle are not transferable to another vehicle. new text end new text begin (e) Using existing revenue from the high-occupancy vehicle lane user fee account, the commissioner, in coordination with the commissioners of commerce and public safety, must publicize and make publicly available information about all-electric vehicles' use of a dynamic shoulder or designated high-occupancy vehicle lane, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) highway signage and electronic billboards; new text end new text begin (2) accessible information on the department's website about qualifying vehicles, the application process, and other relevant and easily understandable information for prospective users; new text end new text begin (3) notification to all certified auto dealers of electric vehicles in Minnesota about the eligibility of all-electric vehicles and information for distribution to purchasers of all-electric vehicles at the point of sale; and new text end new text begin (4) information to be included with a vehicle's registration renewal and all-electric vehicle surcharge notice for owners of those vehicles. new text end new text begin (f) The commissioner of public safety must include information to the owner about the application process under this section for every vehicle assessed the surcharge under section 168.013, subdivision 1m. new text end